Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 1. General Provisions
§ 35-11-112.
Powers and duties of the environmental quality council.

The council shall act as the hearing examiner for the department and shall hear and determine all cases or issues arising under the laws, rules, regulations, standards or orders issued or administered by the department or its air quality, land quality, solid and hazardous waste management or water quality divisions. At the council’s request the office of administrative hearings may provide a hearing officer for any rulemaking or contested case hearing before the council, and the hearing officer may provide recommendations on procedural matters when requested by the council. Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, including this section, the council shall have no authority to promulgate rules or to hear or determine any case or issue arising under the laws, rules, regulations, standards or orders issued or administered by the industrial siting or abandoned mine land divisions of the department. The council shall:

Promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the administration of this act, after recommendation from the director of the department, the administrators of the various divisions and their respective advisory boards;

Conduct hearings as required by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act for the adoption, amendment or repeal of rules, regulations or standards when recommended by the director after the director consults with the advisory boards and the administrators. The council shall approve all rules, regulations and standards of the department before they become final;

Conduct hearings in any case contesting the administration or enforcement of any law, rule, regulation, standard or order issued or administered by the department or any division thereof;

Conduct hearings in any case contesting the grant, denial, suspension, revocation or renewal of any permit, license, certification or variance authorized or required by this act;

Designate at the earliest date and to the extent possible those areas of the state which are very rare or uncommon and have particular historical, archaeological, wildlife, surface geological, botanical or scenic value. When areas of privately owned lands are to be considered for such designation, the council shall give notice to the record owner and hold hearing thereon, within a county in which the area, or major portion thereof, to be so designated is located, in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. No new designations shall be made pursuant to this paragraph after July 1, 2011, but the council shall retain the authority to remove designations made prior to that date;

Adopt and when applicable, enforce the provisions of rule 11 of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure in a contested hearing conducted by the council. The council may modify the procedural provisions of rule 11 to fit the circumstances of a hearing before the council and sanctions imposed by the council. If the provisions of rule 11 are modified at a future date, the council may adopt the modifications.

The council may contract with consultants having special expertise to assist in the performance of its duties.

Subject to any applicable state or federal law, and subject to the right to appeal, the council may:

Approve, disapprove, repeal, modify or suspend any rule, regulation, standard or order of the director or any division administrator;

Order that any permit, license, certification or variance be granted, denied, suspended, revoked or modified;

Affirm, modify or deny the issuance of orders to cease and desist any act or practice in violation of the laws, rules, regulations, standards or orders issued or administered by the department or any division thereof. Upon application by the council, the district court of the county in which the act or practice is taking place shall issue its order to comply with the cease and desist order, and violation of the court order may be punished as a contempt.

The council may employ an executive officer and staff who shall serve at the pleasure of the council. The executive officer and other staff members shall perform duties as the council may assign, including preparing meeting facilities and completing administrative, secretarial and other functions. The department of administration and information shall provide suitable office space for the executive officer and other staff members and shall ensure that any employment authorized under this subsection complies with title 9, chapter 2, article 10 of the Wyoming statutes. The council may negotiate and enter into appropriate memoranda of understanding with the department of administration and information to facilitate administrative support, accounting functions and staffing needs required under this subsection.

The attorney general shall provide legal assistance as the council may require in the proper performance of its duties.

All proceedings of the council shall be conducted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The council shall not promulgate any rules which impose standards or requirements related to meat processing which are more stringent than federal law, rules or regulations.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.12; Laws 1977, ch. 184, § 1; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 2001, ch. 196, § 1; 2007, ch. 143, § 1; 2011, ch. 140, § 1; 2019 ch. 71, § 1, effective February 19, 2019; 2021 ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to duties generally of the attorney general, see §

9-1-603

.

For Rule 11, Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, see

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated.

The 2007 amendment

inserted the second sentence in (a).

Laws 2007, ch. 143, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(v), added the present last sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

in (a)(ii), substituted “regulations or standards when recommended by the director after the director consults with the advisory boards and the administrators” for “regulations, standards or orders recommended by the advisory boards through the administrators and the director” and substituted “regulations and standards” for “regulations, standards or orders”; rewrote (d), which read: “The director and his staff shall provide the council with meeting facilities, secretarial or clerical assistance, supplies and such other assistance as the council may require in the performance of its duties”; and in (e), substituted “The attorney general shall provide legal” for “Upon request, the attorney general shall provide such legal” and “in the proper performance of its duties” for “in the conduct of its hearings, writing of its decisions or the enforcement of its orders. The council may employ independent legal assistance as necessary to the proper performance of its duties.”

Laws 2019, ch. 71, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 19, 2019.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (g).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 143, § 2 states as follows: “There is appropriated fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) from the general fund to the environmental quality council to carry out the purposes of this act.
This general fund appropriation is for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2008.
A request shall be included in the environmental quality council's 2009 2010 biennium standard budget request for purposes of continuing funding of hearing examiners.”

Application. —

Laws 2011, ch. 140, § 2, provides:

“Section 2. Any current designation of lands as very rare or uncommon made pursuant to W.S. 35-11-112(a)(v) prior to the effective date of this act shall remain in effect until removed by the environmental quality council as provided in W.S. 35-11-112(a)(v).”

Legal obligation imposed on council by legislature

is to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to prevent, reduce and eliminate pollution. Tri-State Generation & Transmission Ass'n v. Environmental Quality Council, 590 P.2d 1324,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 369

(Wyo. 1979).

Section

35-11-109

and this section discuss general powers and responsibilities of director and council respectively,

and are general provisions which provide authority for the promulgation of regulations and standards “necessary,” and not on an assembly-line basis which would cause an undesirable inflexibility in the agency's functioning and impair its ability to deal with specialized problems. Torrington v. Environmental Quality Council, 557 P.2d 1143,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1976).

“Rare or uncommon” lands classified by regulation. —

The environmental quality council (EQC) cannot, pursuant to subsection (a)(v), classify lands within the state as “very rare or uncommon” without adopting by regulation the criteria or factors that will establish a standard for such a classification; in the absence of factors or criteria established by regulation, the phrase “very rare or uncommon” is too amorphous to permit judicial review of the action of the EQC, as required by statute; and classifications made on an ad hoc basis are inherently arbitrary and capricious. Rissler & McMurray Co. v. Environmental Quality Council (In re Bessemer Mt.), 856 P.2d 450,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1993).

Jurisdiction over interpreting law on permitting and operating small mines. —

Environmental quality council had subject matter jurisdiction over review of department of environmental quality's interpretation of law governing the permitting and operation of small mines. Platte Dev. Co. v. Environmental Quality Council, 966 P.2d 972,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1998).

Jurisdiction to decide compensatory taking action. —

The legislature has charged the Environmental Quality Council with the responsibility for approving or denying applications for mining permits and until its determination has been rendered, the courts do not have jurisdiction under § 35-11-1001(b) to make a decision on a compensatory taking action or entertain an appeal from the denial of an application for a permit under §

16-3-114

and W.R.A.P. 12. Rissler & McMurry Co. v. State, 917 P.2d 1157,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. July 16, 1996), cert. denied, 519 U.S. 1091, 117 S. Ct. 765, 136 L. Ed. 2d 712, 1997 U.S. LEXIS 532 (U.S. 1997).

Evidence outside the record was properly considered. —

Evidence outside the record was properly considered by the Wyoming Environmental Quality Council with regard to the use of best available control technology in a proposed facility. The Council is not limited to reviewing the administrative record prior to issuing an air quality permit but instead conducts a contested case hearing at which all parties are afforded the opportunity to present new evidence.
Sierra Club v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2011 WY 42, 251 P.3d 310,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2011).

Entitlement to administrative review. —

In an appeal involving the issuance by the Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ) of two general permits for the discharge of produced water from coal bed methane operations, an outdoor council was entitled to administrative review of DEQ's decision to issue the general permits.
Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality v. Wyo. Outdoor Council, 286 P.3d 1045, 2012 WY 135,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Oct 19, 2012).

EQC and DEQ were proper parties to a proceeding challenging new water quality rules. —

After the Wyoming Environmental Quality Council (EQC) adopted proposed revisions to Chapter 1 of the Wyoming Water Quality Rules and Regulations, petitioner special interest groups filed a petition to challenge the new rules and named the Wyoming Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ) as respondent; the district court erred in dismissing the petition for lack of jurisdiction on the ground that the EQC was not named in the petition. The Supreme Court of Wyoming, held that both the EQC and the DEQ were both proper parties to this proceeding under the Wyoming Environmental Quality Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

35-11-101

through

35-11-1904

; the EQC was an agency of the state government pursuant to Wyo. Stat. § 35-11-111(a) with the authority to hear contested matters affecting water quality under Wyo. Stat. § 35-11-112(a).
Wyo. Outdoor Council v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2010 WY 20, 225 P.3d 1054,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2010).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Administrative Law—Broader Jurisdiction for the Wyoming Oil and Gas Conservation Commission. Gulf Oil Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 693 P.2d 227,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 422

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 69 (1986).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

For case note, “An Uncommonly Rare Decision—The Wyoming Supreme Court Orders Agency Rulemaking. In the Matter of Bessemer Mountain, Rissler & McMurray Co. v. Environmental Quality Council (In re Bessemer Mt.), 856 P.2d 450,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1993),” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 615 (1994).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Transporter liability under § 107(a)(4) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) (42 USC § 9607(a)(4)), 112 ALR Fed 49.

§ 35-11-113.
Advisory boards created; membership; removal; terms; meetings; expenses.

There is created within the department three (3) advisory boards, one (1) for each of the air quality, land quality and water quality divisions. Each advisory board shall consist of five (5) members appointed by the governor. Each board shall have one (1) member who represents industry, one (1) member who represents agriculture, one (1) member who represents political subdivisions and two (2) members who represent the public interest. The governor may remove any member of any of the advisory boards as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

For the initial appointments to each board, the governor shall appoint one (1) member for a six (6) year term, two (2) members for four (4) year terms and two (2) members for two (2) year terms. Thereafter all appointments shall be for four (4) year terms. No officer or employee of the state, other than employees of institutions of higher education, may be appointed to a board. A vacancy occurs if any member ceases to represent the interest group or political party for which he was originally appointed, or if any member becomes unable or fails to serve for any reason. The governor shall fill vacancies by appointment for the unexpired portion of the term.

Each advisory board shall meet within sixty (60) days after the effective date of this act to elect from among its members a chairman and a vice-chairman. Such officers shall be elected annually thereafter. Each board shall hold at least four (4) regularly scheduled meetings each year, and special meetings may be called by the chairman at any time. Three (3) members shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business, but all decisions must be approved by a majority of the total membership of the board. Each board shall keep a written record of its meetings and proceedings. Each board member shall be reimbursed for per diem, mileage and expenses for attending board meetings in the same manner and amount as state employees.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.13; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to per diem and traveling expenses of state employees, see §

9-3-102

.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in (a), deleted the former next-to-last sentence, which read, “Not more than three (3) members of each board shall be from the same political party.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 5, makes the act effective on July 1, 1973.

Laws 2016, ch. 119, § 2 state as follows: “Nothing in this act shall be
deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority,
board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments
in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after
the effective date of this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Stated

in

Wyo. Outdoor Council v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2010 WY 20, 225 P.3d 1054,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Feb. 25, 2010).

§ 35-11-114.
Powers and duties of the advisory boards.

The advisory board shall recommend to the council through the administrator and director, comprehensive plans and programs for the management of solid and hazardous waste, the prevention, control and abatement of air, water and land pollution and the protection of public water supplies.

The advisory board shall consult with and advise the administrator and director on the adoption of rules, regulations and standards to implement and carry out the provisions and purposes of this act which relate to their divisions, and variances therefrom.

The advisory boards shall counsel with and advise the administrator of their respective divisions in the administration and performance of all the duties of the division and shall make an annual written report to the governor.

The advisory board shall counsel with and advise each other, the public, and the director of the department in order to coordinate the policies and activities of their respective divisions and to achieve maximum efficiency and effectiveness in furthering the objectives of the department.

Each administrator and staff shall provide the appropriate board with meeting facilities, secretarial or clerical assistance, supplies and such other assistance as each board may require in the performance of its duties.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.14; Laws 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 2019 ch. 71, § 1, effective February 19, 2019.

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 71 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 19, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

in (b), substituted "shall consult with and advise the administrator and director on" for "shall recommend to the council through the administrator and director."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b), see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

EQC and DEQ were proper parties to a proceeding challenging amendments to water quality rules. —

After the Wyoming Environmental Quality Council (EQC) adopted proposed revisions to Chapter 1 of the Wyoming Water Quality Rules and Regulations, petitioner special interest groups filed a petition pursuant to Wyo. Stat. § 16-3-114(a) to challenge the new rules and named the Wyoming Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ) as respondent; the district court erred in dismissing the petition for lack of jurisdiction on the ground that the EQC was not named in the petition. The Supreme Court of Wyoming, held that both the EQC and the DEQ were both proper parties to this proceeding under the Wyoming Environmental Quality Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

35-11-101

through

35-11-1904

.
Wyo. Outdoor Council v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2010 WY 20, 225 P.3d 1054,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2010).

§ 35-11-115.
Power of director to issue emergency orders.

Any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, if the director finds that a condition of air, water or land pollution exists and that it creates an emergency requiring immediate action to protect human or animal health or safety, the director, with the concurrence of the governor, shall order any persons causing or contributing to such pollution to reduce or discontinue immediately the actions causing the condition of pollution and such order shall fix a time and place for hearing before the council within forty-eight (48) hours thereafter. The council shall affirm, modify or set aside the director’s order within forty-eight (48) hours following the adjournment of the hearing.

If the director has evidence that any pollution source presents an immediate and substantial danger to human or animal health or safety, he may institute, through the attorney general, a civil action for immediate injunctive relief to halt any activity causing the danger. The court may issue an ex-parte order and shall schedule a hearing on the matter within three (3) working days from the date the petition for injunctive relief is filed.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any power which the governor or any other officer may have to declare an emergency and act on the basis of such declaration, if such power is conferred by statute or constitutional provision or inheres in the office.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.15.

Cross references. —

As to injunctions, see Rule 65, W.R.C.P.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Governmental recovery of cost of hazardous waste removal under Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (42 USC § 9601 et seq.), 70 ALR Fed 329.